Washington statutes.
RCW 15.35.270

Assessment due date.

All assessments on milk subject to the provisions of this chapter and a marketing order shall be paid to the director on or before the twentieth day of the succeeding month for the milk which was received or handled in the previous month.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 230 s 27.]